Utah statutes.
4-32-7.   Mandatory functions, powers, and duties of department prescribed.
The department shall make rules pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, regarding the following functions, powers, and
duties, in addition to those specified in Title 4, Chapter 1, Utah
Agricultural Code, for the administration and enforcement of this chapter:
(1)  The department shall require antemortem and postmortem inspections,
quarantine, segregation, and reinspections by inspectors appointed for those
purposes with respect to the slaughter of livestock and poultry and the
preparation of livestock and poultry products at official establishments,
except as provided in Subsection 4-32-8(13).
(2)  The department shall require that:
(a)  livestock and poultry be identified for inspection purposes;
(b)  livestock or poultry products, or their containers be marked or labeled
as:
(i)  "Utah Inspected and Passed" if, upon inspection, the products are found
to be unadulterated; and
(ii)  "Utah Inspected and Condemned" if, upon inspection, the products are
found to be adulterated; and
(c)  condemned products, which otherwise would be used for human consumption,
be destroyed under the supervision of an inspector.
(3)  The department shall prohibit or limit livestock products, poultry
products, or other materials not prepared under inspection procedures provided
in this chapter, from being brought into official establishments.
(4)  The department shall require that labels and containers for livestock and
poultry products:
(a)  bear all information required under Section 4-32-3 if the product leaves
the official establishment; and
(b)  be approved prior to sale or transportation.
(5)  For official establishments required to be inspected under Subsection
(1), the department shall:
(a)  prescribe sanitary standards;
(b)  require experts in sanitation or other competent investigators to
investigate sanitary conditions; and
(c)  refuse to provide inspection service if the sanitary conditions allow
adulteration of any livestock or poultry product.
(6) (a)  The department shall require that any person engaged in a business
referred to in Subsection (6)(b) shall:
(i)  keep accurate records disclosing all pertinent business transactions;
(ii)  allow inspection of the business premises at reasonable times and
examination of inventory, records, and facilities; and
(iii)  allow inventory samples to be taken after payment of their fair market
value.
(b)  Subsection (6)(a) shall refer to any person who:
(i)  slaughters livestock or poultry;
(ii)  prepares, freezes, packages, labels, buys, sells, transports, or stores
any livestock or poultry products for human or animal consumption;
(iii)  renders livestock or poultry; or
(iv)  buys, sells, or transports any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased
livestock or poultry, or parts of their carcasses that died by a method other
than slaughter.
(7) (a)  The department shall:
(i)  adopt by reference rules and regulations under federal acts with changes
that the commissioner considers appropriate to make the rules and regulations
applicable to operations and transactions subject to this chapter; and
(ii)  promulgate any other rules considered necessary for the efficient
execution of the provisions of this chapter, including rules of practice
providing an opportunity for hearing in connection with the issuance of orders
under Subsection (5) or under Subsection 4-32-8(1), (2), or (3) and
prescribing procedures for proceedings in these cases.
(b)  These procedures shall not preclude requiring that a label or container
be withheld from use, or inspection be refused under Subsections (1) and (5),
or Subsection 4-32-8(3), pending issuance of a final order in the proceeding.
(8) (a)  To prevent the inhumane slaughtering of livestock and poultry,
inspectors shall be appointed to examine and inspect methods of handling and
slaughtering livestock and poultry.
(b)  Inspection of new slaughtering establishments may be refused or
temporarily suspended if livestock or poultry have been slaughtered or handled
by any method not in accordance with the Humane Methods of Slaughter Act of
1978, Public Law 95-445.
(9) (a)  The department shall require all livestock and poultry showing
symptoms of disease during antemortem inspection, performed by an inspector
appointed for that purpose, to be set apart and slaughtered separately from
other livestock and poultry.
(b)  When slaughtered, the carcasses of livestock and poultry shall be subject
to careful examination and inspection in accordance with rules prescribed by
the commissioner.
